test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UD_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - díigud - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UD_STEM_1

     díigud+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: díigud
     díigud+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: díigud
     díigud+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: díigudaa
     díigud+V+INDIRECT+PAST: díigudaan
     díigud+V+RELATIVE: díiguds
     díigud+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: díigudaas
     díigud+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: díigudaa.ang
     díigud+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: díigudäsaa
     díigud+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: díigudäs
     díigud+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: díigudäsaang
     díigud+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: díigudäsga
     díigud+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: díigudäsaas
     díigud+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: díigudäsaa.ang
     díigud+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: díigud'uuj
     díigud+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: díigud'uujang
     díigud+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: díigudäsaa'uujang
     díigud+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: díigud'us
     díigud+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: díigud'ujaa
     díigud+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'uujaangaa
     díigud+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: díigudäsaa'us
     díigud+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: díigudäsaa'ahlans
     díigud+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: díigudäseehl
     díigud+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: díigud'uu
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: díigud'waa
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: díigud'waa
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: díigud'waang
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: díigud'wägan
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: díigud'aawaa
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: díigud'aawaan
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: díigud'waas
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: díigud'aawaas
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: díigud'waa.ang
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: díigud'aawaa.ang
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'wägiinii
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'wägaangaa
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'wägaangaan
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: díigud'waaäsaa
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: díigud'waaäs
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: díigud'waaäsaang
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: díigud'waaäsga
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: díigud'waaäsaas
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: díigud'waaäsaa.ang
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: díigud'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: díigud'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: díigud'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: díigud'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: díigud'waa'uuj
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: díigud'waa'uujang
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: díigud'waaäsaa'uujang
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: díigud'waa'us
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: díigud'waa'ujaa
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'waa'uujaangaa
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: díigud'waaäsaa'us
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: díigud'waa'ahlanggang
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: díigud'waa'ahlanggan
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'waa'ahlanggiinii
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: díigud'waaäsaa'ahlans
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: díigud'waa'ahlans
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: díigud'aawaa'ahlang
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: díigud'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: díigud'aawaa'ahlanggang
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: díigud'waa'ahl
     díigud+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: díigud'waaäseehl
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: díigud'ang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: díigud'angga
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: díigud'ang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: díigud'anggang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: díigud'anggan
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: díigud'aangaa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: díigud'aangaan
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: díigud'ans
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: díigud'aangaas
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: díigud'angang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: díigud'aangaa.ang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: díigud'anggang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'anggiinii
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'anggaangaa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'anggaangaan
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: díigud'angäsaa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: díigud'angäs
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: díigud'angäsaang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: díigud'angäsga
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: díigud'angäsaas
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: díigud'angäsaa.ang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: díigud'ang'uuj
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: díigud'ang'uujang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: díigud'angäsaa'uujang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: díigud'ang'us
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: díigud'ang'ujaa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'ang'uujaangaa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: díigud'angäsaa'us
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: díigud'aang'ahlanggang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: díigud'aang'ahlanggan
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'aang'ahlanggiinii
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: díigud'angäsaa'ahlans
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: díigud'aang'ahlans
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: díigud'aangaa'ahlang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: díigud'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: díigud'aangaa'ahlanggang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: díigud'aang'ahl
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: díigud'angäseehl
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: díigud'ang'uu
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: díigud'ang'waa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: díigud'ang'waa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: díigud'ang'waang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: díigud'ang'wägan
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: díigud'ang'aawaa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: díigud'ang'aawaan
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: díigud'ang'waas
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: díigud'ang'aawaas
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: díigud'ang'waa.ang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: díigud'ang'aawaa.ang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'ang'wägiinii
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'ang'wägaangaa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'ang'wägaangaan
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: díigud'ang'waaäsaa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: díigud'ang'waaäs
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: díigud'ang'waaäsaang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: díigud'ang'waaäsga
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: díigud'ang'waaäsaas
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: díigud'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: díigud'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: díigud'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: díigud'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: díigud'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: díigud'ang'waa'uuj
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: díigud'ang'waa'uujang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: díigud'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: díigud'ang'waa'us
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: díigud'ang'waa'ujaa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: díigud'ang'waaäsaa'us
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: díigud'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: díigud'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: díigud'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: díigud'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: díigud'ang'waa'ahlans
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: díigud'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: díigud'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: díigud'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: díigud'ang'waa'ahl
     díigud+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: díigud'ang'waaäseehl
